scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     aataweshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaataweshkaan
     aataweshkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aataweshkang
     aataweshkan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aataweshkan
     aataweyaabikinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaataweyaabikinaan
     aataweyaabikinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaataweyaabikinaan
     aataweyaabikinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aataweyaabikinang
     aataweyaabikinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aataweyaabikinan
     aate'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaate'aan
     aate'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaate'aan
     aate'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaate'aan
     aate'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaate'aan
     aate'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aate'ang
     aate'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaate'ang
     aate'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aate'an
     aatewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaatewebinaan
     aatewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaatewebinaan
     aatewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaatewebinaan
     aatewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatewebinaan
     aatewebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatewebinang
     aatewebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaatewebinang
     aatewebinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatewebinan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: oyaatwaakowebinaan
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatwaakowebinang
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaatwaakowebinang
     aatwaakowebinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatwaakowebinan 
     aawadoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaawadoondaan
     aawadoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawadoondaan
     aawadoondan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawadoondang
     aawadoondan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawadoondang
     aawadoondan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawadoondan
     aawajidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaabajidaabaadaan
     aawajidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaawajidaabaadaan
     aawajidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawajidaabaadaan
     aawajidaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawajidaabaadang
     aawajidaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawajidaabaadan
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaawajinigaadaan
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaawajinigaadaan
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaawajinigaadaan
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawajinigaadaan
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawajinigaadang
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawajinigaadang
     aawajinigaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawajinigaadan
     aawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaawenaan
     aawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaawenaan
     aawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaawenaan
     aawenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawenaan
     aawenan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawenang
     aawenan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawenang
     aawenan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawenan
     aawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaawendaan
     aawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaawendaan
     aawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaawendaan
     aawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawendaan
     aawendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawendang
     aawendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawendang
     aawendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawendan
     aawetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaawetaan
     aawetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaawetaan
     aawetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaawetaan
     aawetan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawetaan
     aawetan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawetang
     aawetan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawetang
     aawetan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawetan 
     aazhawaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawaabiiginaan
     aazhawaabiiginan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaazhawaabiiginaan
     aazhawaabiiginan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawaabiiginang
     aazhawaabiiginan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawaabiiginan
